Utah statutes.
58-1-202.   Boards -- Duties, functions, and responsibilities.

(1)  The duties, functions, and responsibilities of each board include the following:

(a)  recommending to the director appropriate rules;

(b)  recommending to the director policy and budgetary matters;

(c)  approving and establishing a passing score for applicant examinations;

(d)  screening applicants and recommending licensing, renewal, reinstatement, and relicensure actions to the director in writing;

(e)  assisting the director in establishing standards of supervision for students or persons in training to become qualified to obtain a license in the occupation or profession it represents; 

(f)  acting as presiding officer in conducting hearings associated with adjudicative proceedings and in issuing recommended orders when so designated by the director; and

(g)  in accordance with Subsection (3), each board may recommend to the appropriate legislative committee whether the board supports a change to the licensing act.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to boards created in Title 58, Chapter 55, Construction Trades Licensing.

(3) (a)  This Subsection (3) applies to the following:

(i)  Chapter 5a, Podiatric Physician Licensing Act;

(ii)  Chapter 16a, Optometry Practice Act;

(iii)  Chapter 17b, Pharmacy Practice Act;

(iv)  Chapter 24b, Physical Therapy Practice Act;

(v)  Chapter 28, Veterinary Practice Act;

(vi)  Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act;

(vii)  Chapter 40a, Athletic Trainer Licensing Act;

(viii)  Chapter 44a, Nurse Midwife Practice Act;

(ix)  Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act;

(x)  Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;

(xi)  Chapter 69, Dentist and Dental Hygienist Practice Act;

(xii)  Chapter 70a, Physician Assistant Act;

(xiii)  Chapter 71, Naturopathic Physician Practice Act; and

(xiv)  Chapter 73, Chiropractic Physician Practice Act.

(b)  Subsection (1)(g) does not:

(i)  require a board's approval to amend a practice act; and

(ii)  apply to technical or clarifying amendments to a practice act.



Amended by Chapter 259, 2012 General Session

